California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
(2) A vehicle that has been converted to use a nonpetroleum-based alternative fuel such as electricity, ethanol, hydrogen, liquefied petroleum gas, methanol, or natural gas through the installation of an alternative fuel retrofit system that has been certified by the State Air Resources Board.

(b) The department shall establish criteria and adopt guidelines for making the loans and for the purchase of vanpool vehicles, including, but not limited to, requirements on the type of vehicles authorized for purchase, areas within the state eligible for the vehicles’ operation, types of routes for the vehicles’ operation, and agencies which are authorized to participate in the program. State agencies may submit loan applications to the department for approval. State agencies receiving loans and purchasing vehicles pursuant to this section shall be responsible for all of the following:

(1) Operational responsibilities for the vehicles, including, but not limited to, vehicle maintenance and repair.

(2) Administration of departmental rideshare programs, including, but not limited to, ridership development and retention.

(3) Compliance with applicable state and federal laws and regulations, including driver and vehicle certification, licenses, and vehicle registration.

(4) Retaining title to vanpool vehicles purchased.

(5) Repayment of the loan for the purchase of the vanpool vehicle.

(c) An agency which receives a loan for the purchase of a vanpool vehicle pursuant to this section shall charge each employee participating in the vanpooling program a monthly fee in an amount determined by the agency. Proceeds of the fees shall be sufficient to fully reimburse the agency for repayment of the loan and for the operational cost of the vanpool vehicle. The operational cost includes, at a minimum, fuel, maintenance, and repairs. The agency shall maintain records to demonstrate that the vanpooling program which it operates is self-supporting.

(d) Funds for loans for purposes of this section shall be provided in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 830, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 16. Traffic Signal Synchronization [2581. - 2581.]

2581.

(a) Investments in traffic signal synchronization may be eligible for an allocation of moneys pursuant to Section 39712 of the Health and Safety Code as a component of an eligible sustainable infrastructure project if both of the following conditions are met:

(1) The sponsoring agency’s legislative or governing body makes a finding that the traffic signal synchronization component is designed and implemented to achieve cost-effective reductions in greenhouse gas emissions.

(2) The traffic signal synchronization component includes specific emissions-reduction targets and metrics to evaluate the traffic signal synchronization component’s
 effect.

(b) A traffic signal synchronization component of a sustainable infrastructure project receiving an allocation of moneys pursuant to subdivision (a) shall meet the requirements of Section 16428.9 of the Government Code and Section 39712 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 594, Sec. 2.   (AB 1447)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 17. Passenger Rail and Clean Air Bond Act of 1990 [2701. - 2701.24.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [2701. - 2701.02.]

2701.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Passenger Rail and Clean Air Bond Act of 1990.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 108, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 108 at the June 5, 1990, election.)
-------------------------------------------

2701.01.

As used in this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Committee” means the Passenger Rail Finance Committee created pursuant to Section 2701.12.

(b) “Department” means the Department of Transportation.

(c) “Fund” means the Passenger Rail Bond Fund created pursuant to Section 2701.05.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 108, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 108 at the June 5, 1990, election.)
-------------------------------------------

2701.02.

The Legislature has provided that, in addition to the one billion dollars ($1,000,000,000) authorized pursuant to this chapter, the Passenger Rail and Clean Air Bond Act of 1992 will be submitted for voter approval for the issuance of additional bonds of one billion dollars ($1,000,000,000) in 1992 and the Passenger Rail and Clean Air Bond Act of 1994 will be submitted for voter approval for the issuance of additional bonds of one billion dollars ($1,000,000,000) in 1994, for a total of three billion dollars ($3,000,000,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 108, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 108 at the June 5, 1990, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Transportation Improvement Program [2701.05. - 2701.08.]

2701.05.

The proceeds of bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited in the Passenger Rail Bond Fund, which is hereby created.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 108, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 108 at the June 5, 1990, election.)
-------------------------------------------

2701.06.

The money in the fund, upon appropriation by the Legislature, shall be available, without regard to fiscal years, for acquisition of rights-of-way, capital expenditures, and acquisition of rolling stock for intercity rail, commuter rail, and urban rail transit and for capital improvements which directly support rail transportation, including exclusive busways which are converted within 10 years after completion of construction into rail lines, grade separations to enhance rail passenger service, and multimodal terminals.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 108, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 108 at the June 5, 1990, election.)
-------------------------------------------

2701.07.

The appropriations for capital improvements and acquisition of rolling stock for intercity rail, commuter rail, and urban rail transit shall be used only on the following routes and corridors and those specified by statutes enacted by the Legislature:

(a) Intercity Rail.

(1) Los Angeles-San Diego.

(2) Santa Barbara County-Los Angeles.

(3) Los Angeles-Fresno-San Francisco Bay area and Sacramento.

(4) San Francisco Bay area-Sacramento-Auburn.

(5) San Francisco-Eureka.

(b) Commuter Rail.

(1) San Francisco-San Jose.

(2) San Jose-Gilroy.

(3) Gilroy-Monterey.

(4) Stockton-Livermore.

(5) Orange County-Los Angeles.

(6) Riverside County-Orange County.

(7) San Bernardino County-Los Angeles.

(8) Ventura County-San Fernando Valley-Los Angeles.

(9) Saugus-Los Angeles.

(10) Oceanside-San Diego.

(11) Escondido-Oceanside.

(12) Riverside-Coachella Valley.

(13) Riverside-Los Angeles.

(14) Jackson-Sacramento.

(15) Jackson-Stockton.

(c) Urban Rail Transit.

(1) Sacramento.

(A) Roseville extension.

(B) Hazel extension.

(C) Meadowview extension.

(D) Arena extension.

(2) San Francisco Bay Area Rapid Transit District.

(A) Bayfair-East Livermore.

(B) Concord-East Antioch.

(C) Fremont-Warm Springs.

(D) Daly City-San Francisco International Airport.

(E) Coliseum-Oakland International Airport.

(F) Richmond-Crockett.

(G) Warm Springs-San Jose.

(3) Alameda and Contra Costa Counties.

(A) Pleasanton-Concord.

(4) Santa Clara County.

(A) Sunnyvale-Santa Clara.

(B) San Jose-Vasona.

(C) State Highway Route 237.

(5) San Francisco City and County.

(A) Extensions, improvements, and additions to the San Francisco Municipal Railway.

(6) San Francisco-Santa Rosa-Sonoma.

(7) Santa Cruz County.

(A) Boardwalk area-University of California at Santa Cruz.

(8) Los Angeles Metro Rail.

(A) Wilshire/Alvarado-Wilshire/Western.

(B) Wilshire/Alvarado-Lankershim/Chandler.

(C) San Fernando Valley extension.

(D) Union Station-State Highway Routes 5 and 710.

(E) Wilshire/Western-Wilshire/State Highway Route 405.

(9) Los Angeles County Rail Corridors.

(A) San Fernando Valley.

(B) Pasadena-Los Angeles.

(C) Coastal Corridor (Torrance to Santa Monica).

(D) Santa Monica-Los Angeles.

(E) State Highway Route 5.

(F) State Highway Route 110.

(10) San Diego County.

(A) El Cajon-Santee.

(B) Downtown-Old Town.

(C) Airport-Point Loma.

(D) Old Town-Mission Valley.

(E) Mission Valley-La Mesa.

(F) La Jolla-Miramar.

(G) Old Town-Del Mar.

(H) Downtown-Escondido.

(I) Chula Vista-Otay Mesa.

(11) Fullerton-Irvine, with an extension from Santa Ana to Stanton, and an extension to Norwalk.

(12) Riverside/San Bernardino to Orange County, including extensions to Redlands and Hemet.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 478, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.   Note: This section was added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 108, and approved in Prop. 108 on June 5, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

2701.08.

At least 15 percent of the money in the fund shall be used for intercity rail purposes and shall be equitably expended on intercity rail corridors based on the relative population served by each corridor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 108, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 108 at the June 5, 1990, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Fiscal Provisions [2701.10. - 2701.24.]

2701.10.

Bonds in the total amount of one billion dollars ($1,000,000,000), exclusive of refunding bonds, or so much thereof as is necessary, may be issued and sold to provide a fund to be used for carrying out the purposes expressed in this chapter and to be used to reimburse the General Obligation Bond Expense Revolving Fund pursuant to Section 16724.5 of the Government Code. The bonds, when sold, shall be and constitute a valid and binding obligation of the State of California, and the full faith and credit of the State of California is hereby pledged for the punctual payment of both principal of, and interest on, the bonds as the principal and interest become due and payable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 108, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 108 at the June 5, 1990, election.)
-------------------------------------------

2701.11.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the bonds authorized by this chapter shall be prepared, executed, issued, sold, paid, and redeemed as provided in the State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code), and all of the provisions of that law apply to the bonds and to this chapter and are hereby incorporated in this chapter as though set forth in full in this chapter.

(b) Notwithstanding any provision of the State General Obligation Bond Law, each issue of bonds authorized by the committee shall have a final maturity of not more than 20 years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 108, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 108 at the June 5, 1990, election.)
-------------------------------------------

2701.12.

(a) Solely for the purpose of authorizing the issuance and sale, pursuant to the State General Obligation Bond Law, of the bonds authorized by this chapter, the Passenger Rail Finance Committee is hereby created. For purposes of this chapter, the Passenger Rail Finance Committee is “the committee” as that term is used in the State General Obligation Bond Law. The committee consists of the Treasurer, the Director of Finance, the Controller, the Secretary of the Business, Transportation and Housing Agency, and the Director of Transportation, or their designated representatives. The Treasurer shall serve as chairperson of the committee. A majority of the committee may act for the committee.

(b) For purposes of the State General Obligation Bond Law, the department is designated the “board.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 108, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 108 at the June 5, 1990, election.)
-------------------------------------------

2701.13.

The committee shall determine whether or not it is necessary or desirable to issue bonds authorized pursuant to this chapter in order to carry out the actions specified in Section 2701.06 and, if so, the amount of bonds to be issued and sold. Successive issues of bonds may be issued and sold to carry out those actions progressively, and it is not necessary that all of the bonds authorized be issued and sold at any one time. The committee shall consider program funding needs, revenue projections, financial market conditions, and other necessary factors in determining the shortest feasible term for the bonds to be issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 108, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 108 at the June 5, 1990, election.)
-------------------------------------------

2701.14.

There shall be collected each year and in the same manner and at the same time as other state revenue is collected, in addition to the ordinary revenues of the state, a sum in an amount required to pay the principal of, and interest on, the bonds each year. It is the duty of all officers charged by law with any duty in regard to the collection of the revenue to do and perform each and every act which is necessary to collect that additional sum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 108, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 108 at the June 5, 1990, election.)
-------------------------------------------

2701.15.

Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, there is hereby appropriated from the General Fund in the State Treasury, for the purposes of this chapter, an amount equal to that sum annually necessary to pay the principal of, and interest on, bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter, as the principal and interest become due and payable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 108, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 108 at the June 5, 1990, election.)
-------------------------------------------

2701.16.

(a) Money may be transferred from the fund to the State Transportation Fund to reimburse the Transportation Planning and Development Account and the State Highway Account for expenditures made from those accounts, on and after June 6, 1990, for capital improvements and acquisitions of rolling stock for intercity rail, commuter rail, and urban rail transit in accordance with Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 14520) of Part 5.3 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, as specified in Section 2701.06.

(b) The amount that may be transferred pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not exceed the amount expended from those accounts for those capital improvements and acquisitions of rolling stock.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 108, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 108 at the June 5, 1990, election.)
-------------------------------------------

2701.17.

The board may request the Pooled Money Investment Board to make a loan from the Pooled Money Investment Account, in accordance with Section 16312 of the Government Code, for purposes of this chapter. The amount of the request shall not exceed the amount of the unsold bonds which the committee has, by resolution, authorized to be sold for the purpose of this chapter, less any amount borrowed pursuant to Section 2701.18. The board shall execute such documents as required by the Pooled Money Investment Board to obtain and repay the loan. Any amount loaned shall be deposited in the fund to be allocated by the board in accordance with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 108, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 108 at the June 5, 1990, election.)
-------------------------------------------

2701.18.

For the purpose of carrying out this chapter, the Director of Finance may authorize the withdrawal from the General Fund of an amount or amounts not to exceed the amount of unsold bonds which have been authorized by the committee to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this chapter, less any amount borrowed pursuant to Section 2701.17. Any amount withdrawn shall be deposited in the fund. Any money made available under this section shall be returned to the General Fund, plus the interest that the amounts would have earned in the Pooled Money Investment Account, from the sale of bonds for the purpose of carrying out this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 108, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 108 at the June 5, 1990, election.)
-------------------------------------------

2701.19.

All money deposited in the fund which is derived from premium and accrued interest on bonds sold shall be reserved in the fund and shall be available for transfer to the General Fund as a credit to expenditures for bond interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 108, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 108 at the June 5, 1990, election.)
-------------------------------------------

2701.20.

The bonds may be refunded in accordance with Article 6 (commencing with Section 16780) of the State General Obligation Bond Law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 108, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 108 at the June 5, 1990, election.)
-------------------------------------------

2701.21.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that, inasmuch as the proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by this chapter are not “proceeds of taxes” as that term is used in Article XIIIB of the California Constitution, the disbursement of these proceeds is not subject to the limitations imposed by that article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 108, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 108 at the June 5, 1990, election.)
-------------------------------------------

2701.22.

Notwithstanding any provision of the State General Obligation Bond Law with regard to the proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by this chapter that are subject to investment under Article 4 (commencing with Section 16470) of Chapter 3 of Part 2 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the Treasurer may maintain a separate account for investment earnings, order the payment of those earnings to comply with any rebate requirement applicable under federal law, and may otherwise direct the use and investment of those proceeds so as to maintain the tax-exempt status of those bonds and to obtain any other advantage under federal law on behalf of the funds of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 108, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 108 at the June 5, 1990, election.)
-------------------------------------------

2701.23.

(a) The department may advance funds in the State Highway Account in the State Transportation Fund for all or a portion of the cost of projects approved for bond funding pursuant to this chapter. The director shall first make a finding that there are adequate funds for the advancement without delaying or adversely affecting any other project. The total amount advanced shall not exceed the amount of the unsold bonds which the committee has, by resolution, authorized to be sold for the purposes of this chapter.

(b) All advances shall be subject to the terms and conditions of an agreement between the department and the public entity which will receive the advancement. The agreement shall contain provisions for reimbursement of the State Highway Account from the proceeds of the next bond sale for funds advanced pursuant to this section. Any amounts advanced pursuant to this section shall be repaid with interest at the rate being earned by the Pooled Money Investment Account at the time of the advance. Interest payments shall be made from the funds of the public entity which received the advancement, other than from the proceeds of bonds authorized by this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 25, Sec. 6.   Effective April 1, 1992.   Note: This section was added originally by Stats. 1989, Ch. 108, and approved in Prop. 108 on June 5, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

2701.24.

Notwithstanding Section 2701.22 or any other provision of this bond act, or of the State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code), if the Treasurer sells bonds pursuant to this bond act that include a bond counsel opinion to the effect that the interest on the bonds is excluded from gross income for federal tax purposes under designated conditions, the Treasurer may maintain separate accounts for the bond proceeds invested and the investment earnings on those proceeds, and may use or direct the use of those proceeds or earnings to pay any rebate, penalty, or other payment required under federal law, or take any other action with respect to the investment and use of those bond proceeds, as may be required or desirable under federal law in order to maintain the tax-exempt status of those bonds and to obtain any other advantage under federal law on behalf of the funds of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 652, Sec. 27.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 18. Federal Aid for Tribes [2702. - 2702.]

2702.

To the extent permitted by federal and state law, a federally recognized Native American tribe shall be eligible for federal funding for a transportation project and may be the lead agency for a transportation project that receives federal funding.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 102, Sec. 1.   (AB 2261)   Effective July 15, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 20. Safe, Reliable High-Speed Passenger Train Bond Act for the 21st Century [2704. - 2704.21.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [2704. - 2704.01.]

2704.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Safe, Reliable High-Speed Passenger Train Bond Act for the 21st Century.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 267, Sec. 9.   Approved in Proposition 1A at the November 4, 2008, election.)
-------------------------------------------

2704.01.

As used in this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Committee” means the High-Speed Passenger Train Finance Committee created pursuant to Section 2704.12.

(b) “Authority” means the High-Speed Rail Authority created pursuant to Section 185020 of the Public Utilities Code, or its successor.

(c) “Fund” means the High-Speed Passenger Train Bond Fund created pursuant to Section 2704.05.

(d) “High-speed train” means a passenger train capable of sustained revenue operating speeds of at least 200 miles per hour where conditions permit those speeds.

(e) “High-speed train system” means a system with high-speed trains and includes, but is not limited to, the following components: right-of-way, track, power system, rolling stock, stations, and associated facilities.

(f) “Corridor” means a portion of the high-speed train system as described in Section 2704.04.

(g) “Usable segment” means a portion of a corridor that includes at least two stations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 267, Sec. 9.   Approved in Proposition 1A at the November 4, 2008, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. High-Speed Passenger Train Financing Program [2704.04. - 2704.095.]

2704.04.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature by enacting this chapter and of the people of California by approving the bond measure pursuant to this chapter to initiate the construction of a high-speed train system that connects the San Francisco Transbay Terminal to Los Angeles Union Station and Anaheim, and links the state’s major population centers, including Sacramento, the San Francisco Bay Area, the Central Valley, Los Angeles, the Inland Empire, Orange County, and San Diego consistent with the authority’s certified environmental impact reports of November 2005 and July 9, 2008.

(b) (1) Net proceeds received from the sale of nine billion dollars ($9,000,000,000) principal amount of bonds authorized pursuant to this chapter, upon appropriation by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act, shall be used for (A) planning and engineering for the high-speed train system and (B) capital costs, as described in subdivision (c).

(2) As adopted by the authority in May 2007, Phase 1 of the high-speed train project is the corridor of the high-speed train system between San Francisco Transbay Terminal and Los Angeles Union Station and Anaheim.

(3) Upon a finding by the authority that expenditure of bond proceeds for capital costs in corridors other than the corridor described in paragraph (2) would advance the construction of the system, would be consistent with the criteria described in subdivision (f) of Section 2704.08, and would not have an adverse impact on the construction of Phase 1 of the high-speed train project, the authority may request funding for capital costs, and the Legislature may appropriate funds described in paragraph (1) in the annual Budget Act, to be expended for any of the following high-speed train corridors:

(A) Sacramento to Stockton to Fresno.

(B) San Francisco Transbay Terminal to San Jose to Fresno.

(C) Oakland to San Jose.

(D) Fresno to Bakersfield to Palmdale to Los Angeles Union Station.

(E) Los Angeles Union Station to Riverside to San Diego.

(F) Los Angeles Union Station to Anaheim to Irvine.

(G) Merced to Stockton to Oakland and San Francisco via the Altamont Corridor.

(4) Nothing in this section shall prejudice the authority’s determination and selection of the alignment from the Central Valley to the San Francisco Bay Area and its certification of the environmental impact report.

(5) Revenues of the authority, generated by operations of the high-speed train system above and beyond operating and maintenance costs and financing obligations, including, but not limited to, support of revenue bonds, as determined by the authority, shall be used for construction, expansion, improvement, replacement, and rehabilitation of the high-speed train system.

(c) Capital costs payable or reimbursable from proceeds of bonds described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) include, with respect to the high-speed train system or any portion thereof, all activities necessary for acquisition of interests in real property and rights-of-way and improvement thereof; acquisition and construction of tracks, structures, power systems, and stations; acquisition of rolling stock and related equipment; mitigation of any direct or indirect environmental impacts of activities authorized by this chapter; relocation assistance for displaced property owners and occupants; other related capital facilities and equipment; and such other purposes related to the foregoing, for the procurement thereof, and for the financing or refinancing thereof, as may be set forth in a statute hereafter enacted. The method of acquisition of any of the foregoing may also be set forth in a statute hereafter enacted.

(d) Proceeds of bonds authorized pursuant to this chapter shall not be used for any operating or maintenance costs of trains or facilities.

(e) The State Auditor shall perform periodic audits of the authority’s use of proceeds of bonds authorized pursuant to this chapter for consistency with the requirements of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 267, Sec. 9.   Approved in Proposition 1A at the November 4, 2008, election.)
-------------------------------------------

2704.05.

Subject to Section 2704.18, the proceeds of bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited in the High-Speed Passenger Train Bond Fund, which is hereby created.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 267, Sec. 9.   Approved in Proposition 1A at the November 4, 2008, election.)
-------------------------------------------

2704.06.

The net proceeds received from the sale of nine billion dollars ($9,000,000,000) principal amount of bonds authorized pursuant to this chapter, upon appropriation by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act, shall be available, and subject to those conditions and criteria that the Legislature may provide by statute, for (a) planning the high-speed train system and (b) capital costs set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 2704.04, consistent with the authority’s certified environmental impact reports of November 2005 and July 9, 2008, as subsequently modified pursuant to environmental studies conducted by the authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 267, Sec. 9.   Approved in Proposition 1A at the November 4, 2008, election.)
-------------------------------------------

2704.07.

The authority shall pursue and obtain other private and public funds, including, but not limited to, federal funds, funds from revenue bonds, and local funds, to augment the proceeds of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 267, Sec. 9.   Approved in Proposition 1A at the November 4, 2008, election.)
-------------------------------------------

2704.08.

(a) Proceeds of bonds described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 2704.04 shall not be used for more than 50 percent of the total cost of construction of each corridor or usable segment thereof of the high-speed train system, except for bond proceeds used for the purposes of subdivision (g).

(b) Not more than 10 percent of the proceeds of bonds described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 2704.04 shall be used for environmental studies, planning, and preliminary engineering activities.

(c) (1) No later than 90 days prior to the submittal to the Legislature and the Governor of the initial request for appropriation of proceeds of bonds authorized by this chapter for any eligible capital costs on each corridor, or usable segment thereof, identified in subdivision (b) of Section 2704.04, other than costs described in subdivision (g), the authority shall have approved and submitted to the Director of Finance, the peer review group established pursuant to Section 185035 of the Public Utilities Code, and the policy committees with jurisdiction over transportation matters and the fiscal committees in both houses of the Legislature, a detailed funding plan for that corridor or a usable segment thereof.

(2) The plan shall include, identify, or certify to all of the following:

(A) The corridor, or usable segment thereof, in which the authority is proposing to invest bond proceeds.

(B) A description of the expected terms and conditions associated with any lease agreement or franchise agreement proposed to be entered into by the authority and any other party for the construction or operation of passenger train service along the corridor or usable segment thereof.

(C) The estimated full cost of constructing the corridor or usable segment thereof, including an estimate of cost escalation during construction and appropriate reserves for contingencies.

(D) The sources of all funds to be invested in the corridor, or usable segment thereof, and the anticipated time of receipt of those funds based on expected commitments, authorizations, agreements, allocations, or other means.

(E) The projected ridership and operating revenue estimate based on projected high-speed passenger train operations on the corridor or usable segment.

(F) All known or foreseeable risks associated with the construction and operation of high-speed passenger train service along the corridor or usable segment thereof and the process and actions the authority will undertake to manage those risks.

(G) Construction of the corridor or usable segment thereof can be completed as proposed in the plan.

(H) The corridor or usable segment thereof would be suitable and ready for high-speed train operation.

(I) One or more passenger service providers can begin using the tracks or stations for passenger train service.

(J) The planned passenger service by the authority in the corridor or usable segment thereof will not require a local, state, or federal operating subsidy.

(K) The authority has completed all necessary project level environmental clearances necessary to proceed to construction.

(d) Prior to committing any proceeds of bonds described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 2704.04 for expenditure for construction and real property and equipment acquisition on each corridor, or usable segment thereof, other than for costs described in subdivision (g), the authority shall have approved and concurrently submitted to the Director of Finance and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee the following: (1) a detailed funding plan for that corridor or usable segment thereof that (A) identifies the corridor or usable segment thereof, and the estimated full cost of constructing the corridor or usable segment thereof, (B) identifies the sources of all funds to be used and anticipates time of receipt thereof based on offered commitments by private parties, and authorizations, allocations, or other assurances received from governmental agencies, (C) includes a projected ridership and operating revenue report, (D) includes a construction cost projection including estimates of cost escalation during construction and appropriate reserves for contingencies, (E) includes a report describing any material changes from the plan submitted pursuant to subdivision (c) for this corridor or usable segment thereof, and (F) describes the terms and conditions associated with any agreement proposed to be entered into by the authority and any other party for the construction or operation of passenger train service along the corridor or usable segment thereof; and (2) a report or reports, prepared by one or more financial services firms, financial consulting firms, or other consultants, independent of any parties, other than the authority, involved in funding or constructing the high-speed train system, indicating that (A) construction of the corridor or usable segment thereof can be completed as proposed in the plan submitted pursuant to paragraph (1), (B) if so completed, the corridor or usable segment thereof would be suitable and ready for high-speed train operation, (C) upon completion, one or more passenger service providers can begin using the tracks or stations for passenger train service, (D) the planned passenger train service to be provided by the authority, or pursuant to its authority, will not require operating subsidy, and (E) an assessment of risk and the risk mitigation strategies proposed to be employed. The Director of Finance shall review the plan within 60 days of its submission by the authority and, after receiving any communication from the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, if the director finds that the plan is likely to be successfully implemented as proposed, the authority may enter into commitments to expend bond funds that are subject to this subdivision and accept offered commitments from private parties.

(e) Subsequent to approval of the detailed funding plan required under subdivision (d), the authority shall promptly inform the Governor and the Legislature of any material changes in plans or project conditions that would jeopardize completion of the corridor as previously planned and shall identify means of remedying the conditions to allow completion and operation of the corridor.

(f) In selecting corridors or usable segments thereof for construction, the authority shall give priority to those corridors or usable segments thereof that are expected to require the least amount of bond funds as a percentage of total cost of construction. Among other criteria it may use for establishing priorities for initiating construction on corridors or usable segments thereof, the authority shall include the following: (1) projected ridership and revenue, (2) the need to test and certify trains operating at speeds of 220 miles per hour, (3) the utility of those corridors or usable segments thereof for passenger train services other than the high-speed train service that will not result in any unreimbursed operating or maintenance cost to the authority, and (4) the extent to which the corridors include facilities contained therein to enhance the connectivity of the high-speed train network to other modes of transit, including, but not limited to, conventional rail (intercity rail, commuter rail, light rail, or other rail transit), bus, or air transit.

(g) Nothing in this section shall limit use or expenditure of proceeds of bonds described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 2704.04 up to an amount equal to 7.5 percent of the aggregate principal amount of bonds described in that paragraph for environmental studies, planning, and preliminary engineering activities, and for (1) acquisition of interests in real property and right-of-way and improvement thereof (A) for preservation for high-speed rail uses, (B) to add to third-party improvements to make them compatible with high-speed rail uses, or (C) to avoid or to mitigate incompatible improvements or uses; (2) mitigation of any direct or indirect environmental impacts resulting from the foregoing; and (3) relocation assistance for property owners and occupants who are displaced as a result of the foregoing.

(h) Not more than 2.5 percent of the proceeds of bonds described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 2704.04 shall be used for administrative purposes. The amount of bond proceeds available for administrative purposes shall be appropriated in the annual Budget Act. The Legislature may, by statute, adjust the percentage set forth in this subdivision, except that the Legislature shall not increase that percentage to more than 5 percent.

(i) No failure to comply with this section shall affect the validity of the bonds issued under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 267, Sec. 9.   Approved in Proposition 1A at the November 4, 2008, election.)
-------------------------------------------

2704.09.

The high-speed train system to be constructed pursuant to this chapter shall be designed to achieve the following characteristics:

(a) Electric trains that are capable of sustained maximum revenue operating speeds of no less than 200 miles per hour.

(b) Maximum nonstop service travel times for each corridor that shall not exceed the following:

(1) San Francisco-Los Angeles Union Station: two hours, 40 minutes.

(2) Oakland-Los Angeles Union Station: two hours, 40 minutes.

(3) San Francisco-San Jose: 30 minutes.

(4) San Jose-Los Angeles: two hours, 10 minutes.

(5) San Diego-Los Angeles: one hour, 20 minutes.

(6) Inland Empire-Los Angeles: 30 minutes.

(7) Sacramento-Los Angeles: two hours, 20 minutes.

(c) Achievable operating headway (time between successive trains) shall be five minutes or less.

(d) The total number of stations to be served by high-speed trains for all of the corridors described in subdivision (b) of Section 2704.04 shall not exceed 24. There shall be no station between the Gilroy station and the Merced station.

(e) Trains shall have the capability to transition intermediate stations, or to bypass those stations, at mainline operating speed.

(f) For each corridor described in subdivision (b), passengers shall have the capability of traveling from any station on that corridor to any other station on that corridor without being required to change trains.

(g) In order to reduce impacts on communities and the environment, the alignment for the high-speed train system shall follow existing transportation or utility corridors to the extent feasible and shall be financially viable, as determined by the authority.

(h) Stations shall be located in areas with good access to local mass transit or other modes of transportation.

(i) The high-speed train system shall be planned and constructed in a manner that minimizes urban sprawl and impacts on the natural environment.

(j) Preserving wildlife corridors and mitigating impacts to wildlife movement, where feasible as determined by the authority, in order to limit the extent to which the system may present an additional barrier to wildlife’s natural movement.
